Utah statutes.
77-15a-103.   Court may raise issue of mental retardation at any time.

The court in which a capital charge is pending may raise the issue of the defendant's mental retardation at any time.  If raised by the court, counsel for each party shall be allowed to address the issue of mental retardation.



Enacted by Chapter 11, 2003 General Session

